Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Fire Prevention and Protection

227.200.
Definitions for KRS 227.200 to 227.400.

As used in KRS

227.200

to

227.400

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of housing, buildings and construction;

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Fire investigator” means a deputy fire marshal who has been appointed by the state fire marshal to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers in order to investigate crimes set out in KRS Chapter 513 and other crimes discovered in the course of investigation;

“Fire loss” means loss of or damage to property, loss of life or personal injury, by fire, lightning, or explosion;

“Order” or “special order” means an order of the state fire marshal, designed for the prevention of fire loss, that affects or may affect the property rights of a particular owner or designated property;

“Owner” means any person who owns, occupies, or has charge of any property;

“Property” means property of all types, both real and personal, movable and immovable; and

“Rule” or “regulation” means a general order of the commissioner, designed for the prevention of fire loss, which affects or may affect property rights of a designated class of owners or for the prevention of fire loss by certain indicated hazards.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 1; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(11); 1974, ch. 241, § 1; 1978, ch. 117, § 37, effective July 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 155, § 124, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 305, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 361, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 389, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 128, § 9, effective January 1, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2019). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has changed the internal numbering of this statute to place definitions in alphabetical order. No words were changed in this process.

227.205.
Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction created — Organization.

The Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction is hereby created within the Public Protection Cabinet. The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor in accordance with KRS

12.040

, and who shall report to the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet. The office of the commissioner shall also include a deputy commissioner and an executive assistant to the commissioner, who shall be the policy making assistants to the commissioner and shall be appointed pursuant to KRS

12.050

. The department shall consist of the Division of Fire Prevention, the Division of Building Codes Enforcement, the Division of Plumbing, the Electrical Division, and the Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning (HVAC).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 126, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 70, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 86, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 390, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 125, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 169, § 64, effective June 29, 2017.

227.210.
Delegation of state fire marshal’s powers and duties.

Any power, duty or function, whether ministerial, discretionary or whatever character, vested in or imposed upon the state fire marshal, by any provision of KRS

227.200

to

227.410

,

227.550

to

227.660

, and

227.990

to

227.992

may be exercised, discharged, and performed by any deputy or assistant of the state fire marshal acting in the state fire marshal’s name and by his delegated authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 2; 1978, ch. 305, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 391, effective July 15, 2010.

227.220.
Duties of state fire marshal and chief state building official relating to fire loss.

The state fire marshal shall enforce or aid in the enforcement of all laws, administrative regulations, and ordinances of the state and its political subdivisions relating to fire loss as defined in KRS

227.200

:

The prevention or reduction of loss by fire or by other hazard or risk insured by property or casualty insurance companies doing business in this state, except as to disability insurance and workers’ compensation, and shall enforce any other regulations or methods adopted for the prevention of loss from such hazards or risks in order to promote the safety of persons or property;

The manufacture, transportation, storage, sale, or use of combustibles, explosives, and hazardous materials or equipment;

The design, construction, and maintenance of property which has a direct bearing on safety to life and property;

The construction, installation, maintenance, or equipment of fire alarm systems, fire protection and extinguishing equipment, and fire escapes and other means of access to or exit from property; and

Arson and related offenses.

The chief state building official shall enforce and administer all applicable provisions of the Kentucky Building Code, including all the provisions designed for the prevention of fire loss, and shall have all the powers and duties awarded by KRS Chapter 198B and the Kentucky Building Code.

The state fire marshal is authorized to:

Investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances of fires and explosions for the purpose of detecting and suppressing arson and related offenses, or for the purpose of minimizing or preventing fire loss;

Supervise and make periodic inspections of all property within the state, and assist cities having fire departments in making like periodic inspections of all property in cities, except occupied private dwellings;

Issue and enforce reasonable emergency orders and orders in accordance with KRS

227.330

for the prevention of fire loss, and for the adoption, approval, and installation of safety measures, remodeling, and equipment as will minimize fire loss;

Provide technical and engineering advice and assistance to state and local governmental agencies in relation to fire prevention or fire protection;

Direct and assist owners of educational institutions, places of public assembly, institutional buildings, public buildings, factories, business buildings, or other places where persons congregate, in the instruction of fire prevention, and the holding of fire drills;

Conduct fire prevention and educational campaigns;

Conduct examinations into the cause, origin, or circumstances of fire losses;

Hold administrative hearings in accordance with the KRS Chapter 13B, as may be required by law or deemed by the state fire marshal necessary or desirable as to any matter within the scope of this chapter. All administrative hearings shall be public, unless the state fire marshal, or an authorized designee, determines that a private hearing would be in the public interest, in which case, and only with the consent of all parties to the hearing, the hearing shall be private;

Direct research in the field of fire protection and accept gifts and grants for these purposes;

Appoint deputy fire marshals to be fire investigators; and

Recommend curricula for advanced courses and seminars in fire science training in colleges and institutions of higher education.

The state fire marshal shall head the Division of Fire Prevention in the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 3; 1978, ch. 305, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 71, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 138, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 392, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 128, § 10, effective January 1, 2019.

227.223.
Cooperation with Department of Corrections — Assistance in training — Removal of jurisdiction over job.

The state fire marshal shall cooperate with the Department of Corrections in the development of fire safety regulations for jails and assist in the training of jail inspectors employed by the Department of Corrections.

Effective January 1, 1983, the Department of Corrections shall possess all authority and responsibility for fire prevention and reduction of loss by fire in jails as defined in KRS

441.005

. Upon the request of the commissioner of the Department of Corrections, the state fire marshal shall investigate the cause and circumstances of fires or explosions in jails.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 36, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 83, effective July 14, 1992.

227.225.
Status of single family dwellings.

Except for the powers conferred by KRS 227.220(3)(a), the rights, powers and privileges granted under this chapter to the state fire marshal shall not apply to any single family dwelling in this Commonwealth.

Any city, county or urban-county government of the Commonwealth may extend, by ordinance, the application of this chapter to those single family dwellings exempted under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 305, § 25, effective June 17, 1978.

227.230.
State fire marshal — Deputies — Assistants — Employees.

The commissioner shall appoint a state fire marshal, who shall appoint such deputy fire marshals, assistants, and employees as are necessary to exercise, discharge, or perform any power, duty or function vested in, imposed upon, or delegated to the state fire marshal by law or regulation. The state fire marshal, under the general direction of the commissioner, shall enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter and any other duties assigned by law or regulation. The chief of each fire department and the sheriff of each county shall be deemed deputies when ordered by the state fire marshal to act as such for their respective jurisdictions. Other deputy fire marshals may be appointed from the members of the fire department as the state fire marshal deems necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 4; 1966, ch. 146, § 3; 1978, ch. 305, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 393, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A deputy state fire marshal (paid a monthly salary) may not also serve as a county police officer at night.

OAG 80-576

.

227.235.
Deputy fire marshals appointed as fire investigators — Training required for certification by Kentucky Law Enforcement Council — Peace officer powers — Prohibited acts.

A deputy fire marshal appointed to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers shall take an oath to faithfully perform the duties of his or her office, shall affirm that he or she possesses the minimum qualifications under KRS

15.382

, and shall undergo a basic training course approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

The employing agency of the deputy fire marshal shall pay for the training required for certification by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

Upon the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council’s verification that the required standards have been met, a fire investigator shall have peace officer powers to investigate crimes set out in KRS Chapter 513 and other crimes discovered in the course of investigation.

A fire investigator shall not:

Patrol the roads, streets, or highways;

Issue traffic citations; or

Perform general law enforcement duties outside of investigating crimes set out in KRS Chapter 513 and other crimes discovered in the course of investigation.

All fire investigators appointed to exercise peace officer powers under KRS

227.220

that are appointed on or after January 1, 2019, shall, within one (1) year of their appointment or employment, successfully complete a basic training course as established by KRS

15.440

at a school certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

All fire investigators specified in subsection (5) of this section shall, upon completion of the basic training required, successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training as established by KRS 15.440(1)(e) that has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

All fire investigators appointed or employed before January 1, 2019, shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training as established by KRS 15.440(1)(e) that has been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of the fire investigator such as injury, illness, or personal tragedy which prevents the fire investigator from completing the basic or in-service training within the time specified in this section, the officer shall complete the training within one (1) year after return to duty. Any fire investigator who fails to successfully complete the basic or in-service training within the specified time period shall not be authorized thereafter to carry deadly weapons or make arrests and may be removed from an appointment as a fire investigator.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 128, § 11, effective January 1, 2019.

227.240.
Investigating and reporting on fires.

The chief of each fire department, sheriff, or local deputy marshal ordered under KRS

227.230

shall immediately investigate the origin and circumstances of a fire in his or her area and determine the cause of the fire so far as practicable. If it appears that the fire is of suspicious origin, he or she shall immediately notify the state fire marshal and the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 5; 1966, ch. 146, § 4; 1978, ch. 305, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 85, § 259, effective June 26, 2007.

227.250.
Duty of insurers to report losses from fire, lightning, hazardous materials, flammable liquids or explosions.

Every insurer authorized to transact business in this state shall report to the state fire marshal such loss or damage by fire, lightning, hazardous materials, flammable liquids or explosion occurring to, in or on property insured by such insurer in this state, as may be, and in the manner prescribed by the state fire marshal. Provided, however, the state fire marshal may waive the reporting of such losses if, in his discretion, the losses are unimportant because of the small amount involved and a saving in time and expense will result.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 6; 1978, ch. 305, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.

227.260.
Records of fire inspections, investigations and losses.

From the reports made to him by insurers, employees, or appointees, the state fire marshal shall keep a record of all fire inspections, investigations and fire losses occurring in this state and of facts concerning them. He shall make such compilations, investigations and statistical summaries as he deems proper, all of which shall be kept as permanent records in his office. All such records shall be public, except that the state fire marshal may, in his discretion, withhold from the public such records, including reports of investigations of accidents and of fire losses, as may be exempted from disclosure by KRS Chapter 61 and regulations duly adopted thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 7; 1978, ch. 305, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, Access to Public Documents in Kentucky, 64 Ky. L.J. 165 (1975-76).

227.270.
Jurisdiction of state fire marshal — Rights of entry for inspections and investigations.

The state fire marshal shall have jurisdiction over all property in the state insofar as it is necessary for the administration and enforcement of any duty imposed on the office by law or regulation and all laws, ordinances, regulations and orders designed to protect the public from fire loss.

The state fire marshal or his employee or appointee may, without delay or advance notice and at all reasonable hours of the day or night, enter in or upon any property to make an inspection or investigation for the purpose of preventing fire loss or determining the origin of any fire, but this subsection shall apply to the interior of private, occupied dwellings only when a fire has occurred therein or when the officer has reason to believe that unsafe fire conditions exist in the building.

No person shall obstruct, hinder or delay such an officer in the performance of his duty.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 8; 1978, ch. 305, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.

227.273.
Inspection of certain commercial properties.

The state fire marshal shall perform inspections on all commercial properties identified by names and addresses supplied under KRS

304.35-105

within a reasonable time after their submission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 305, § 23, effective June 17, 1978.

227.275.
Arson investigators.

The commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police, may designate officers and employees of the Department of Kentucky State Police to investigate and enforce the provisions against arson and arson related offenses occurring within the state and such officers when duly authorized by the commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police, shall have the general powers of a peace officer for the prevention of other offenses against the Commonwealth.

Each arson investigator so appointed shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or her various duties, take an oath before a person authorized to administer oaths to faithfully discharge his or her duties, and the oath shall be subscribed by the person taking it and filed in the records of the department.

Each of said persons shall give such bond as the commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police, may designate and with such surety as required by the commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police, conditioned upon faithful performance of his or her duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 225, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(8); 1978, ch. 384, § 90, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 85, § 260, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1988). A technical correction has been made in this section by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to
KRS

7.136

.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If volunteer fire departments, in the course of extinguishing a fire, discover evidence indicating that arson may be involved, they can and should contact the arson investigators who have been designated by the Bureau (now Department) of State Police to investigate and enforce the provisions against arson and arson related offenses.

OAG 80-611

.

227.280.
Subpoena and oath — Production of evidence — Conduct of examinations — Contempt.

The state fire marshal may subpoena witnesses; may administer oaths; may require the production of books, papers, accounts, documents, and other records or materials of an evidentiary nature; and may examine witnesses in any investigation or other fact-finding proceeding authorized under this chapter.

Examinations may be public or private. Persons other than those required to be present may be excluded from the place where the examination or investigation is held, and witnesses may be kept separate and apart from each other and not allowed to communicate with each other until they have been examined.

If any person fails to respond to a subpoena, or refuses to be sworn, or refuses to testify, or fails or refuses to produce any record or material called for, or fails or refuses to comply with a lawful order of the fire marshal or any deputy fire marshal or performs any contemptuous or contumacious act after being summoned to appear in connection with an investigation or fact-finding proceeding authorized under this chapter, the fire marshal or any deputy fire marshal, as the case may be, shall certify the facts to the Circuit Court of the county in which the offense was committed. That court shall have jurisdiction to hear, try, and punish these persons as in other cases of contempt.

The same fees shall be paid for the service of process, for the taking of depositions, and for the services of stenographers as is provided for like services in Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 9; 1978, ch. 305, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 139, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fees and compensation of certain public officers, KRS ch. 64.

227.290.
Commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police, to furnish data.

If, after an investigation or examination, the commissioner, Department of Kentucky State Police, believes that the evidence concerning a fire indicates that a crime has been committed, he or she shall furnish all data of an evidentiary nature in his or her possession to the county attorney of the county in which the fire took place, or the Commonwealth’s attorney in that district, and request that such attorney institute such criminal proceeding as the evidence warrants.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 10; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(8); 1978, ch. 384, § 91, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 85, § 261, effective June 26, 2007.

227.300.
Standards of safety — Conformance with Uniform State Building Code — Publication of guidelines — Participation in drafting standards by institutions offering infant and preschool care — Supplemental regulations on temporary change of use.

The commissioner shall promulgate reasonable administrative regulations based on good engineering practice and principles as embodied in recognized standards of fire prevention and protection, providing for a reasonable degree of safety for human life against the exigencies of fire and panic, and insuring as far as is practicable against fire loss. Such rules and regulations shall be known as the standards of safety. After promulgation of the Uniform State Building Code, no part of the standards of safety shall establish, in whole or in part, any building code other than the Uniform State Building Code, but the commissioner may supplement the Uniform State Building Code with fire safety regulations designed to operate in conjunction with the code.

In making such administrative regulations the commissioner shall establish minimum fire prevention and protection requirements, including but not limited to requirements for design, construction, installation, operation, storage, handling, maintenance, or use of the following: structural requirements for the various types of construction; building restrictions within congested districts; exit facilities from structures; fire alarm systems and fire extinguishing systems; fire emergency drills; maximum occupancy loads and other requirements for buildings of public assembly; flue and chimney construction; heating devices; boilers and pressure vessels; electrical wiring and equipment; air conditioning, ventilating and other duct systems; refrigeration systems; flammable liquids, oil and gas wells; garages, repair, and service shops; application of flammable finishes, acetylene, liquefied petroleum gas, and similar products; calcium carbide and acetylene generators; dry cleaning and dyeing plants; flammable motion picture film; combustible fibers; airports and airport buildings; hazardous chemicals; rubbish; open flame devices; parking of vehicles; dust explosions; lightning protection; and other special fire hazards.

For the purpose of integrating the need for safety from hazards of fire with the other safety needs of infants or preschool children under institutional care, the commissioner shall allow persons who own, manage, or are employed by institutions which provide care or education for infants or preschool children to participate in drafting the standards of safety as they apply to such institutions. Such participation shall be by representation of professional associations relating to infant and preschool care, and by representation from other individuals licensed to provide infant and preschool care, on a committee chaired by the state fire marshal or his or her designate. Such participation shall occur prior to the publication of proposed regulations in the administrative register pursuant to KRS

13A.050

but shall not limit any individual’s right to use those procedures set forth in KRS Chapter 13A concerning comment on or protest of proposed regulations. All professional associations relating to infant and preschool care shall be notified by the commissioner when the drafting of standards of safety relating to such institutions is commenced and all such professional associations shall be regularly notified of the time and place of any meetings conducted by authorized employees of the department for the purpose of drafting such standards.

The commissioner shall publish guidelines relating to the standards of safety as they apply to day care and preschool child care centers and nurseries which shall indicate the items inspectors from the Division of Fire Prevention will be looking for when they conduct inspections pursuant to the standards of safety. Such guidelines shall be made available to persons who own, operate, or manage such centers or nurseries and shall be designed to enable said persons to anticipate and comply with the requirements of the standards of safety.

The commissioner shall issue supplemental regulations addressing the temporary change of use in buildings as authorized by KRS Chapter 198B. These regulations shall establish specific standards for such use and shall be designed to operate in conjunction with the Kentucky Building Code.

Any standards of safety or other regulations promulgated under this section shall be subject to the requirements of KRS 198B.030(8).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 11; 1976, ch. 295, § 1; 1976, ch. 296, § 1; 1978, ch. 117, § 38, effective July 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 155, § 125, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 305, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 163, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2006, ch. 256, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 394, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 15, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 169, § 65, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). A reference in subsection (4) of this section as amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 394, to “Division of Fire Protection” has been changed in codification to “Division of Fire Prevention” to conform with the listing of divisions within the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction contained in KRS

227.205

as amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 24, sec. 390.

227.305.
Minimum requirements for facilities for physically handicapped in public buildings and public accommodations — Regulations. [Repealed.]

227.310.
Hearing on proposed standards of safety — Notice.

The commissioner shall conduct a hearing prior to the issuance of rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS

227.300

. At such hearing interested parties shall be given an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. The commissioner shall cause a notice of such hearing to be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. No defect or inaccuracy in the notice or in its publication shall invalidate any such rules or regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 12; 1966, ch. 239, § 170; 2010, ch. 24, § 395, effective July 15, 2010.

227.320.
Local adoption of safety standards — Minimum requirements.

The authorities of any county, city, or other political subdivision shall adopt and enforce the standards of safety promulgated by the commissioner, and may enter upon private property to enforce required fire lane open space in parking lots containing space for ten (10) or more vehicles. Whenever the commissioner, by rules and regulations prescribes a standard of safety from fire loss, such rules and regulations shall establish a minimum requirement concerning the matters covered thereby and shall be so construed in relation to any local rules and regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 13; 1966, ch. 146, § 5; 1970, ch. 157, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(11); 1978, ch. 305, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 396, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under this section and KRS

86.160

(repealed), a city of the fourth class may establish fire lanes within the parking area of a shopping center and install the necessary traffic devices relating thereto.

OAG 69-399

.

There is no conflict between Jefferson County’s open burning regulation and a standard of safety enacted by the division of fire prevention of the Department of Public Safety, KSftyS-18, 1.5.9., concerning the burning of materials which have previously contained high explosives, since KSftyS-18, 1.5.9. merely establishes the minimum standard throughout the Commonwealth and clearly qualifies such materials for the exception cited in Jefferson County’s regulation banning open burning.

OAG 74-30

.

227.330.
Powers of state fire marshal relating to fire hazards — Orders — Appeals.

Whenever the state fire marshal or any deputy state fire marshal finds that any property is not safe as to fire loss, under the terms and conditions of this chapter and under the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, or that the practices or methods of construction or operation, or processes or materials employed or used in connection therewith do not afford adequate protection from fire loss, under this chapter or under applicable administrative regulations, he shall order that additions, improvements, repairs, or changes be made and equipment be provided or action be taken that will reasonably render the property safe.

Orders and notices of the state fire marshal shall be effective only when in writing signed by him or by his authority.

Every order of the fire marshal shall state its effective date and shall concisely state:

The grounds or alleged violations on which based;

The provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations pursuant to which action is so taken or proposed to be taken;

The date by which the alleged violation shall be corrected or eliminated and the correction recommended therefor; and

All other matters required by law.

Except as provided by KRS

227.340

, an order or notice may be given by delivery to the person to be ordered or notified or his agent or by mailing it, postage prepaid, addressed to him at his principal place of business or residence as last of record in the department.

Before any order issued under subsection (1) of this section is enforceable, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided the owner or his agent in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Whenever the state fire marshal or any deputy state fire marshal designated by him for that purpose finds that a violation or violations of the provisions of this chapter or any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder render any property especially susceptible to fire loss, and there is present such hazard to human life or limb that the public safety imperatively requires emergency action, a fire inspector or other state fire marshal employee may be authorized in writing by the state fire marshal to issue an emergency order pursuant to KRS

13B.125

that directs the property to be closed to the public or vacated by its occupants until the violation is corrected.

Notwithstanding the above upon receipt of notice of an emergency order issued under subsection (6) of this section, an owner or agent may seek a temporary restraining order prohibiting its enforcement in the Circuit Court within whose jurisdiction the property is located. The court shall review the emergency order and may prohibit its enforcement.

Appeals from any order issued or action taken under this section may be taken in the manner prescribed by KRS

227.335

.

An order prepared by the state fire marshal’s designee and approved in writing by the state fire marshal shall be considered the state fire marshal’s order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 14; 1972, ch. 203, § 48; 1978, ch. 117, § 40, effective July 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 305, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 140, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 397, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Before a fiscal court could employ a contractor to repair a courthouse, the court had to first have plans for remodeling the structure from an architect or professional engineer.

OAG 70-111

.

Plans for remodeling a courthouse which was closed as a fire hazard by order of the state fire marshal must meet the requirements of the standards of safety promulgated pursuant to KRS

227.300

and be prepared by an architect or professional engineer.

OAG 70-111

.

The fact that deficiencies had been noted in the courthouse building by the Fire Marshal’s office would not necessarily preclude the county from proceeding to remodel the courtroom of the courthouse, presuming, however, that the county adhered to the requirements of the administrative regulations adopted on behalf of the State Fire Marshal’s office by submitting, to the State Fire Marshal’s office for inspection and approval by that office, the plans and specifications involving the proposed remodeling project; even if the county complied with the requirements of the regulation and obtained a permit to remodel the courtroom, it would not be relieved of its obligation to correct all the other deficiencies in the courthouse discovered by the State Fire Marshal’s office during the course of its authorized inspections.

OAG 78-187

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Groves and Hill, The New Statewide Uniform Building Code, Vol. 42, No. 4, October, 1978, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

227.331.
Violation of administrative regulations or orders — Administrative fines — Enforcement actions.

Any person who willfully violates any administrative regulation, emergency order, or final order of the state fire marshal shall be subject to suspension or revocation of certificate of authority, occupancy, or other license or permit, or administrative fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in lieu of suspension or revocation, for violation of the provision to which the administrative regulation or order relates, after notice and hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

It shall be the duty of the state fire marshal, or upon the commissioner’s request, of the Attorney General, to bring an action to enforce any proper order made or action taken by the state fire marshal or on his or her authority, or for the recovery of the penalties provided in subsection (1) of this section, and to bring an action for a restraining order or for a temporary or permanent injunction, as the state fire marshal deems necessary for the prevention or correction of a condition constituting or threatening to constitute a violation of this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. In any action for a restraining order or for a temporary or permanent injunction, allegations in a verified complaint or affidavit by the state fire marshal deputy or employee that the respondent is in violation of specified fire prevention and protection laws or administrative regulations and the violation or violations present such hazard to human life or limb that the public safety imperatively requires emergency action shall be sufficient under Rule 65 of the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure to show that the applicant’s rights are being or will be violated and that he or she will suffer immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage before notice can be served and a hearing had thereon or pending a final judgment in the action.

All actions for enforcement, recovery of administrative fines, and injunctive relief for violations of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the state fire marshal, or upon the commissioner’s request by the Attorney General, in the Circuit Court within which the property involved is located.

If the state fire marshal has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this chapter, for which criminal penalties are provided and in his or her opinion prosecution would be in order, he or she shall give the information relative thereto to the appropriate county attorney, Commonwealth’s attorney, or to the Attorney General. The county attorney, Commonwealth’s attorney, or Attorney General shall promptly institute any action or proceedings against the person as in his or her opinion the information may require or justify.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 305, § 17, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 141, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 398, effective July 15, 2010.

227.332.
Notice of hearings.

The state fire marshal shall give written notice of a hearing as required by KRS Chapter 13B. In addition to all parties to the hearing, the state fire marshal shall give this notice to all persons whose pecuniary interests, to the state fire marshal’s knowledge or belief, are to be directly and immediately affected by the hearing.

If any hearing is to be held for consideration of administrative regulations of the commissioner, or of other matters which, under subsection (1) of this section, would otherwise require separate notice to more than thirty (30) persons, in lieu of other notice the commissioner may give notice of the hearing by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424; but the commissioner shall mail the notice to all persons who had requested the same in writing in advance and have paid to the commissioner the reasonable amount fixed by him or her to cover the cost thereof.

All notices, other than notices provided for in subsection (2) of this section, shall be given as provided in KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 305, § 18, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 142, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 399, effective July 15, 2010.

227.333.
Conduct of hearings. [Repealed.]

227.334.
Hearings — Orders. [Repealed.]

227.335.
Appeal of orders.

An appeal from the state fire marshal shall be taken only from a final order on hearing.

Any person who was a party to a hearing and who is aggrieved by the final order may appeal in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B to the Circuit Court within which the property is located.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 305, § 21, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 143, effective July 15, 1996.